Illinois, session 104th, SB1653.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 5A-12.7 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5A-12.7)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2026)8    Sec. 5A-12.7. Continuation of hospital access payments on 9and after July 1, 2020.10    (a) To preserve and improve access to hospital services, 11for hospital services rendered on and after July 1, 2020, the 12Department shall, except for hospitals described in subsection 13(b) of Section 5A-3, make payments to hospitals or require 14capitated managed care organizations to make payments as set 15forth in this Section. Payments under this Section are not due 16and payable, however, until: (i) the methodologies described 17in this Section are approved by the federal government in an 18appropriate State Plan amendment or directed payment preprint; 19and (ii) the assessment imposed under this Article is 20determined to be a permissible tax under Title XIX of the 21Social Security Act. In determining the hospital access 22payments authorized under subsection (g) of this Section, if a 23hospital ceases to qualify for payments from the pool, the   SB1653- 2 -LRB104 09504 KTG 19567 b1payments for all hospitals continuing to qualify for payments 2from such pool shall be uniformly adjusted to fully expend the 3aggregate net amount of the pool, with such adjustment being 4effective on the first day of the second month following the 5date the hospital ceases to receive payments from such pool.6    (b) Amounts moved into claims-based rates and distributed 7in accordance with Section 14-12 shall remain in those 8claims-based rates.9    (c) Graduate medical education.10        (1) The calculation of graduate medical education 11    payments shall be based on the hospital's Medicare cost 12    report ending in Calendar Year 2018, as reported in the 13    Healthcare Cost Report Information System file, release 14    date September 30, 2019. An Illinois hospital reporting 15    intern and resident cost on its Medicare cost report shall 16    be eligible for graduate medical education payments.17        (2) Each hospital's annualized Medicaid Intern 18    Resident Cost is calculated using annualized intern and 19    resident total costs obtained from Worksheet B Part I, 20    Columns 21 and 22 the sum of Lines 30-43, 50-76, 90-93, 21    96-98, and 105-112 multiplied by the percentage that the 22    hospital's Medicaid days (Worksheet S3 Part I, Column 7, 23    Lines 2, 3, 4, 14, 16-18, and 32) comprise of the 24    hospital's total days (Worksheet S3 Part I, Column 8, 25    Lines 14, 16-18, and 32).26        (3) An annualized Medicaid indirect medical education   SB1653- 3 -LRB104 09504 KTG 19567 b1    (IME) payment is calculated for each hospital using its 2    IME payments (Worksheet E Part A, Line 29, Column 1) 3    multiplied by the percentage that its Medicaid days 4    (Worksheet S3 Part I, Column 7, Lines 2, 3, 4, 14, 16-18, 5    and 32) comprise of its Medicare days (Worksheet S3 Part 6    I, Column 6, Lines 2, 3, 4, 14, and 16-18).7        (4) For each hospital, its annualized Medicaid Intern 8    Resident Cost and its annualized Medicaid IME payment are 9    summed, and, except as capped at 120% of the average cost 10    per intern and resident for all qualifying hospitals as 11    calculated under this paragraph, is multiplied by the 12    applicable reimbursement factor as described in this 13    paragraph, to determine the hospital's final graduate 14    medical education payment. Each hospital's average cost 15    per intern and resident shall be calculated by summing its 16    total annualized Medicaid Intern Resident Cost plus its 17    annualized Medicaid IME payment and dividing that amount 18    by the hospital's total Full Time Equivalent Residents and 19    Interns. If the hospital's average per intern and resident 20    cost is greater than 120% of the same calculation for all 21    qualifying hospitals, the hospital's per intern and 22    resident cost shall be capped at 120% of the average cost 23    for all qualifying hospitals.24            (A) For the period of July 1, 2020 through 25        December 31, 2022, the applicable reimbursement factor 26        shall be 22.6%.   SB1653- 4 -LRB104 09504 KTG 19567 b1            (B) For the period of January 1, 2023 through 2        December 31, 2026, the applicable reimbursement factor 3        shall be 35% for all qualified safety-net hospitals, 4        as defined in Section 5-5e.1 of this Code, and all 5        hospitals with 100 or more Full Time Equivalent 6        Residents and Interns, as reported on the hospital's 7        Medicare cost report ending in Calendar Year 2018, and 8        for all other qualified hospitals the applicable 9        reimbursement factor shall be 30%. 10    (d) Fee-for-service supplemental payments. For the period 11of July 1, 2020 through December 31, 2022, each Illinois 12hospital shall receive an annual payment equal to the amounts 13below, to be paid in 12 equal installments on or before the 14seventh State business day of each month, except that no 15payment shall be due within 30 days after the later of the date 16of notification of federal approval of the payment 17methodologies required under this Section or any waiver 18required under 42 CFR 433.68, at which time the sum of amounts 19required under this Section prior to the date of notification 20is due and payable.21        (1) For critical access hospitals, $385 per covered 22    inpatient day contained in paid fee-for-service claims and 23    $530 per paid fee-for-service outpatient claim for dates 24    of service in Calendar Year 2019 in the Department's 25    Enterprise Data Warehouse as of May 11, 2020.26        (2) For safety-net hospitals, $960 per covered   SB1653- 5 -LRB104 09504 KTG 19567 b1    inpatient day contained in paid fee-for-service claims and 2    $625 per paid fee-for-service outpatient claim for dates 3    of service in Calendar Year 2019 in the Department's 4    Enterprise Data Warehouse as of May 11, 2020.5        (3) For long term acute care hospitals, $295 per 6    covered inpatient day contained in paid fee-for-service 7    claims for dates of service in Calendar Year 2019 in the 8    Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of May 11, 2020.9        (4) For freestanding psychiatric hospitals, $125 per 10    covered inpatient day contained in paid fee-for-service 11    claims and $130 per paid fee-for-service outpatient claim 12    for dates of service in Calendar Year 2019 in the 13    Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of May 11, 2020.14        (5) For freestanding rehabilitation hospitals, $355 15    per covered inpatient day contained in paid 16    fee-for-service claims for dates of service in Calendar 17    Year 2019 in the Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as 18    of May 11, 2020.19        (6) For all general acute care hospitals and high 20    Medicaid hospitals as defined in subsection (f), $350 per 21    covered inpatient day for dates of service in Calendar 22    Year 2019 contained in paid fee-for-service claims and 23    $620 per paid fee-for-service outpatient claim in the 24    Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of May 11, 2020.25        (7) Alzheimer's treatment access payment. Each 26    Illinois academic medical center or teaching hospital, as   SB1653- 6 -LRB104 09504 KTG 19567 b1    defined in Section 5-5e.2 of this Code, that is identified 2    as the primary hospital affiliate of one of the Regional 3    Alzheimer's Disease Assistance Centers, as designated by 4    the Alzheimer's Disease Assistance Act and identified in 5    the Department of Public Health's Alzheimer's Disease 6    State Plan dated December 2016, shall be paid an 7    Alzheimer's treatment access payment equal to the product 8    of the qualifying hospital's State Fiscal Year 2018 total 9    inpatient fee-for-service days multiplied by the 10    applicable Alzheimer's treatment rate of $226.30 for 11    hospitals located in Cook County and $116.21 for hospitals 12    located outside Cook County.13    (d-2) Fee-for-service supplemental payments. Beginning 14January 1, 2023, each Illinois hospital shall receive an 15annual payment equal to the amounts listed below, to be paid in 1612 equal installments on or before the seventh State business 17day of each month, except that no payment shall be due within 1830 days after the later of the date of notification of federal 19approval of the payment methodologies required under this 20Section or any waiver required under 42 CFR 433.68, at which 21time the sum of amounts required under this Section prior to 22the date of notification is due and payable. The Department 23may adjust the rates in paragraphs (1) through (7) to comply 24with the federal upper payment limits, with such adjustments 25being determined so that the total estimated spending by 26hospital class, under such adjusted rates, remains   SB1653- 7 -LRB104 09504 KTG 19567 b1substantially similar to the total estimated spending under 2the original rates set forth in this subsection. 3        (1) For critical access hospitals, as defined in 4    subsection (f), $750 per covered inpatient day contained 5    in paid fee-for-service claims and $750 per paid 6    fee-for-service outpatient claim for dates of service in 7    Calendar Year 2019 in the Department's Enterprise Data 8    Warehouse as of August 6, 2021.9        (2) For safety-net hospitals, as described in 10    subsection (f), $1,350 per inpatient day contained in paid 11    fee-for-service claims and $1,350 per paid fee-for-service 12    outpatient claim for dates of service in Calendar Year 13    2019 in the Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of 14    August 6, 2021.15        (3) For long term acute care hospitals, $550 per 16    covered inpatient day contained in paid fee-for-service 17    claims for dates of service in Calendar Year 2019 in the 18    Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of August 6, 19    2021.20        (4) For freestanding psychiatric hospitals, $200 per 21    covered inpatient day contained in paid fee-for-service 22    claims and $200 per paid fee-for-service outpatient claim 23    for dates of service in Calendar Year 2019 in the 24    Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of August 6, 25    2021.26        (5) For freestanding rehabilitation hospitals, $550   SB1653- 8 -LRB104 09504 KTG 19567 b1    per covered inpatient day contained in paid 2    fee-for-service claims and $125 per paid fee-for-service 3    outpatient claim for dates of service in Calendar Year 4    2019 in the Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of 5    August 6, 2021.6        (6) For all general acute care hospitals and high 7    Medicaid hospitals as defined in subsection (f), $500 per 8    covered inpatient day for dates of service in Calendar 9    Year 2019 contained in paid fee-for-service claims and 10    $500 per paid fee-for-service outpatient claim in the 11    Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of August 6, 12    2021.13        (7) For public hospitals, as defined in subsection 14    (f), $275 per covered inpatient day contained in paid 15    fee-for-service claims and $275 per paid fee-for-service 16    outpatient claim for dates of service in Calendar Year 17    2019 in the Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of 18    August 6, 2021.19        (8) Alzheimer's treatment access payment. Each 20    Illinois academic medical center or teaching hospital, as 21    defined in Section 5-5e.2 of this Code, that is identified 22    as the primary hospital affiliate of one of the Regional 23    Alzheimer's Disease Assistance Centers, as designated by 24    the Alzheimer's Disease Assistance Act and identified in 25    the Department of Public Health's Alzheimer's Disease 26    State Plan dated December 2016, shall be paid an   SB1653- 9 -LRB104 09504 KTG 19567 b1    Alzheimer's treatment access payment equal to the product 2    of the qualifying hospital's Calendar Year 2019 total 3    inpatient fee-for-service days, in the Department's 4    Enterprise Data Warehouse as of August 6, 2021, multiplied 5    by the applicable Alzheimer's treatment rate of $244.37 6    for hospitals located in Cook County and $312.03 for 7    hospitals located outside Cook County.8    (e) The Department shall require managed care 9organizations (MCOs) to make directed payments and 10pass-through payments according to this Section. Each calendar 11year, the Department shall require MCOs to pay the maximum 12amount out of these funds as allowed as pass-through payments 13under federal regulations. The Department shall require MCOs 14to make such pass-through payments as specified in this 15Section. The Department shall require the MCOs to pay the 16remaining amounts as directed Payments as specified in this 17Section. The Department shall issue payments to the 18Comptroller by the seventh business day of each month for all 19MCOs that are sufficient for MCOs to make the directed 20payments and pass-through payments according to this Section. 21The Department shall require the MCOs to make pass-through 22payments and directed payments using electronic funds 23transfers (EFT), if the hospital provides the information 24necessary to process such EFTs, in accordance with directions 25provided monthly by the Department, within 7 business days of 26the date the funds are paid to the MCOs, as indicated by the   SB1653- 10 -LRB104 09504 KTG 19567 b1"Paid Date" on the website of the Office of the Comptroller if 2the funds are paid by EFT and the MCOs have received directed 3payment instructions. If funds are not paid through the 4Comptroller by EFT, payment must be made within 7 business 5days of the date actually received by the MCO. The MCO will be 6considered to have paid the pass-through payments when the 7payment remittance number is generated or the date the MCO 8sends the check to the hospital, if EFT information is not 9supplied. If an MCO is late in paying a pass-through payment or 10directed payment as required under this Section (including any 11extensions granted by the Department), it shall pay a penalty, 12unless waived by the Department for reasonable cause, to the 13Department equal to 5% of the amount of the pass-through 14payment or directed payment not paid on or before the due date 15plus 5% of the portion thereof remaining unpaid on the last day 16of each 30-day period thereafter. Payments to MCOs that would 17be paid consistent with actuarial certification and enrollment 18in the absence of the increased capitation payments under this 19Section shall not be reduced as a consequence of payments made 20under this subsection. The Department shall publish and 21maintain on its website for a period of no less than 8 calendar 22quarters, the quarterly calculation of directed payments and 23pass-through payments owed to each hospital from each MCO. All 24calculations and reports shall be posted no later than the 25first day of the quarter for which the payments are to be 26issued.  SB1653- 11 -LRB104 09504 KTG 19567 b1    (f)(1) For purposes of allocating the funds included in 2capitation payments to MCOs, Illinois hospitals shall be 3divided into the following classes as defined in 4administrative rules:5        (A) Beginning July 1, 2020 through December 31, 2022, 6    critical access hospitals. Beginning January 1, 2023, 7    "critical access hospital" means a hospital designated by 8    the Department of Public Health as a critical access 9    hospital, excluding any hospital meeting the definition of 10    a public hospital in subparagraph (F). 11        (B) Safety-net hospitals, except that stand-alone 12    children's hospitals that are not specialty children's 13    hospitals and, for calendar years 2025 and 2026 only, 14    hospitals with over 9,000 Medicaid acute care inpatient 15    admissions per calendar year, excluding admissions for 16    Medicare-Medicaid dual eligible patients, will not be 17    included. For the calendar year beginning January 1, 2023, 18    and each calendar year thereafter, assignment to the 19    safety-net class shall be based on the annual safety-net 20    rate year beginning 15 months before the beginning of the 21    first Payout Quarter of the calendar year. 22        (C) Long term acute care hospitals.23        (D) Freestanding psychiatric hospitals.24        (E) Freestanding rehabilitation hospitals.25        (F) Beginning January 1, 2023, "public hospital" means 26    a hospital that is owned or operated by an Illinois   SB1653- 12 -LRB104 09504 KTG 19567 b1    Government body or municipality, excluding a hospital 2    provider that is a State agency, a State university, or a 3    county with a population of 3,000,000 or more. 4        (G) High Medicaid hospitals. 5            (i) As used in this Section, "high Medicaid 6        hospital" means a general acute care hospital that:7                (I) For the payout periods July 1, 2020 8            through December 31, 2022, is not a safety-net 9            hospital or critical access hospital and that has 10            a Medicaid Inpatient Utilization Rate above 30% or 11            a hospital that had over 35,000 inpatient Medicaid 12            days during the applicable period. For the period 13            July 1, 2020 through December 31, 2020, the 14            applicable period for the Medicaid Inpatient 15            Utilization Rate (MIUR) is the rate year 2020 MIUR 16            and for the number of inpatient days it is State 17            fiscal year 2018. Beginning in calendar year 2021, 18            the Department shall use the most recently 19            determined MIUR, as defined in subsection (h) of 20            Section 5-5.02, and for the inpatient day 21            threshold, the State fiscal year ending 18 months 22            prior to the beginning of the calendar year. For 23            purposes of calculating MIUR under this Section, 24            children's hospitals and affiliated general acute 25            care hospitals shall be considered a single 26            hospital.  SB1653- 13 -LRB104 09504 KTG 19567 b1                (II) For the calendar year beginning January 2            1, 2023, and each calendar year thereafter, is not 3            a public hospital, safety-net hospital, or 4            critical access hospital and that qualifies as a 5            regional high volume hospital or is a hospital 6            that has a Medicaid Inpatient Utilization Rate 7            (MIUR) above 30%. As used in this item, "regional 8            high volume hospital" means a hospital which ranks 9            in the top 2 quartiles based on total hospital 10            services volume, of all eligible general acute 11            care hospitals, when ranked in descending order 12            based on total hospital services volume, within 13            the same Medicaid managed care region, as 14            designated by the Department, as of January 1, 15            2022. As used in this item, "total hospital 16            services volume" means the total of all Medical 17            Assistance hospital inpatient admissions plus all 18            Medical Assistance hospital outpatient visits. For 19            purposes of determining regional high volume 20            hospital inpatient admissions and outpatient 21            visits, the Department shall use dates of service 22            provided during State Fiscal Year 2020 for the 23            Payout Quarter beginning January 1, 2023. The 24            Department shall use dates of service from the 25            State fiscal year ending 18 month before the 26            beginning of the first Payout Quarter of the   SB1653- 14 -LRB104 09504 KTG 19567 b1            subsequent annual determination period. 2            (ii) For the calendar year beginning January 1, 3        2023, the Department shall use the Rate Year 2022 4        Medicaid inpatient utilization rate (MIUR), as defined 5        in subsection (h) of Section 5-5.02. For each 6        subsequent annual determination, the Department shall 7        use the MIUR applicable to the rate year ending 8        September 30 of the year preceding the beginning of 9        the calendar year. 10        (H) General acute care hospitals. As used under this 11    Section, "general acute care hospitals" means all other 12    Illinois hospitals not identified in subparagraphs (A) 13    through (G).14    (2) Hospitals' qualification for each class shall be 15assessed prior to the beginning of each calendar year and the 16new class designation shall be effective January 1 of the next 17year. The Department shall publish by rule the process for 18establishing class determination.19    (3) Beginning January 1, 2024, the Department may reassign 20hospitals or entire hospital classes as defined above, if 21federal limits on the payments to the class to which the 22hospitals are assigned based on the criteria in this 23subsection prevent the Department from making payments to the 24class that would otherwise be due under this Section. The 25Department shall publish the criteria and composition of each 26new class based on the reassignments, and the projected impact   SB1653- 15 -LRB104 09504 KTG 19567 b1on payments to each hospital under the new classes on its 2website by November 15 of the year before the year in which the 3class changes become effective. 4    (g) Fixed pool directed payments. Beginning July 1, 2020, 5the Department shall issue payments to MCOs which shall be 6used to issue directed payments to qualified Illinois 7safety-net hospitals and critical access hospitals on a 8monthly basis in accordance with this subsection. Prior to the 9beginning of each Payout Quarter beginning July 1, 2020, the 10Department shall use encounter claims data from the 11Determination Quarter, accepted by the Department's Medicaid 12Management Information System for inpatient and outpatient 13services rendered by safety-net hospitals and critical access 14hospitals to determine a quarterly uniform per unit add-on for 15each hospital class.16        (1) Inpatient per unit add-on. A quarterly uniform per 17    diem add-on shall be derived by dividing the quarterly 18    Inpatient Directed Payments Pool amount allocated to the 19    applicable hospital class by the total inpatient days 20    contained on all encounter claims received during the 21    Determination Quarter, for all hospitals in the class.22            (A) Each hospital in the class shall have a 23        quarterly inpatient directed payment calculated that 24        is equal to the product of the number of inpatient days 25        attributable to the hospital used in the calculation 26        of the quarterly uniform class per diem add-on,   SB1653- 16 -LRB104 09504 KTG 19567 b1        multiplied by the calculated applicable quarterly 2        uniform class per diem add-on of the hospital class.3            (B) Each hospital shall be paid 1/3 of its 4        quarterly inpatient directed payment in each of the 3 5        months of the Payout Quarter, in accordance with 6        directions provided to each MCO by the Department.7        (2) Outpatient per unit add-on. A quarterly uniform 8    per claim add-on shall be derived by dividing the 9    quarterly Outpatient Directed Payments Pool amount 10    allocated to the applicable hospital class by the total 11    outpatient encounter claims received during the 12    Determination Quarter, for all hospitals in the class.13            (A) Each hospital in the class shall have a 14        quarterly outpatient directed payment calculated that 15        is equal to the product of the number of outpatient 16        encounter claims attributable to the hospital used in 17        the calculation of the quarterly uniform class per 18        claim add-on, multiplied by the calculated applicable 19        quarterly uniform class per claim add-on of the 20        hospital class.21            (B) Each hospital shall be paid 1/3 of its 22        quarterly outpatient directed payment in each of the 3 23        months of the Payout Quarter, in accordance with 24        directions provided to each MCO by the Department.25        (3) Each MCO shall pay each hospital the Monthly 26    Directed Payment as identified by the Department on its   SB1653- 17 -LRB104 09504 KTG 19567 b1    quarterly determination report.2        (4) Definitions. As used in this subsection:3            (A) "Payout Quarter" means each 3 month calendar 4        quarter, beginning July 1, 2020.5            (B) "Determination Quarter" means each 3 month 6        calendar quarter, which ends 3 months prior to the 7        first day of each Payout Quarter.8        (5) For the period July 1, 2020 through December 2020, 9    the following amounts shall be allocated to the following 10    hospital class directed payment pools for the quarterly 11    development of a uniform per unit add-on:12            (A) $2,894,500 for hospital inpatient services for 13        critical access hospitals.14            (B) $4,294,374 for hospital outpatient services 15        for critical access hospitals.16            (C) $29,109,330 for hospital inpatient services 17        for safety-net hospitals.18            (D) $35,041,218 for hospital outpatient services 19        for safety-net hospitals.20        (6) For the period January 1, 2023 through December 21    31, 2023, the Department shall establish the amounts that 22    shall be allocated to the hospital class directed payment 23    fixed pools identified in this paragraph for the quarterly 24    development of a uniform per unit add-on. The Department 25    shall establish such amounts so that the total amount of 26    payments to each hospital under this Section in calendar   SB1653- 18 -LRB104 09504 KTG 19567 b1    year 2023 is projected to be substantially similar to the 2    total amount of such payments received by the hospital 3    under this Section in calendar year 2021, adjusted for 4    increased funding provided for fixed pool directed 5    payments under subsection (g) in calendar year 2022, 6    assuming that the volume and acuity of claims are held 7    constant. The Department shall publish the directed 8    payment fixed pool amounts to be established under this 9    paragraph on its website by November 15, 2022. 10            (A) Hospital inpatient services for critical 11        access hospitals.12            (B) Hospital outpatient services for critical 13        access hospitals.14            (C) Hospital inpatient services for public 15        hospitals.16            (D) Hospital outpatient services for public 17        hospitals.18            (E) Hospital inpatient services for safety-net 19        hospitals.20            (F) Hospital outpatient services for safety-net 21        hospitals.22        (7) Semi-annual rate maintenance review. The 23    Department shall ensure that hospitals assigned to the 24    fixed pools in paragraph (6) are paid no less than 95% of 25    the annual initial rate for each 6-month period of each 26    annual payout period. For each calendar year, the   SB1653- 19 -LRB104 09504 KTG 19567 b1    Department shall calculate the annual initial rate per day 2    and per visit for each fixed pool hospital class listed in 3    paragraph (6), by dividing the total of all applicable 4    inpatient or outpatient directed payments issued in the 5    preceding calendar year to the hospitals in each fixed 6    pool class for the calendar year, plus any increase 7    resulting from the annual adjustments described in 8    subsection (i), by the actual applicable total service 9    units for the preceding calendar year which were the basis 10    of the total applicable inpatient or outpatient directed 11    payments issued to the hospitals in each fixed pool class 12    in the calendar year, except that for calendar year 2023, 13    the service units from calendar year 2021 shall be used. 14            (A) The Department shall calculate the effective 15        rate, per day and per visit, for the payout periods of 16        January to June and July to December of each year, for 17        each fixed pool listed in paragraph (6), by dividing 18        50% of the annual pool by the total applicable 19        reported service units for the 2 applicable 20        determination quarters.21            (B) If the effective rate calculated in 22        subparagraph (A) is less than 95% of the annual 23        initial rate assigned to the class for each pool under 24        paragraph (6), the Department shall adjust the payment 25        for each hospital to a level equal to no less than 95% 26        of the annual initial rate, by issuing a retroactive   SB1653- 20 -LRB104 09504 KTG 19567 b1        adjustment payment for the 6-month period under review 2        as identified in subparagraph (A). 3    (h) Fixed rate directed payments. Effective July 1, 2020, 4the Department shall issue payments to MCOs which shall be 5used to issue directed payments to Illinois hospitals not 6identified in paragraph (g) on a monthly basis. Prior to the 7beginning of each Payout Quarter beginning July 1, 2020, the 8Department shall use encounter claims data from the 9Determination Quarter, accepted by the Department's Medicaid 10Management Information System for inpatient and outpatient 11services rendered by hospitals in each hospital class 12identified in paragraph (f) and not identified in paragraph 13(g). For the period July 1, 2020 through December 2020, the 14Department shall direct MCOs to make payments as follows:15        (1) For general acute care hospitals an amount equal 16    to $1,750 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 17    20 case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied 18    by the hospital's total number of inpatient admissions for 19    category of service 20 for the determination quarter.20        (2) For general acute care hospitals an amount equal 21    to $160 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 22    21 case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied 23    by the hospital's total number of inpatient admissions for 24    category of service 21 for the determination quarter.25        (3) For general acute care hospitals an amount equal 26    to $80 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 22   SB1653- 21 -LRB104 09504 KTG 19567 b1    case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied by 2    the hospital's total number of inpatient admissions for 3    category of service 22 for the determination quarter.4        (4) For general acute care hospitals an amount equal 5    to $375 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 6    24 case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied 7    by the hospital's total number of category of service 24 8    paid EAPG (EAPGs) for the determination quarter.9        (5) For general acute care hospitals an amount equal 10    to $240 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 11    27 and 28 case mix index for the determination quarter 12    multiplied by the hospital's total number of category of 13    service 27 and 28 paid EAPGs for the determination 14    quarter.15        (6) For general acute care hospitals an amount equal 16    to $290 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 17    29 case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied 18    by the hospital's total number of category of service 29 19    paid EAPGs for the determination quarter.20        (7) For high Medicaid hospitals an amount equal to 21    $1,800 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 20 22    case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied by 23    the hospital's total number of inpatient admissions for 24    category of service 20 for the determination quarter.25        (8) For high Medicaid hospitals an amount equal to 26    $160 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 21   SB1653- 22 -LRB104 09504 KTG 19567 b1    case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied by 2    the hospital's total number of inpatient admissions for 3    category of service 21 for the determination quarter.4        (9) For high Medicaid hospitals an amount equal to $80 5    multiplied by the hospital's category of service 22 case 6    mix index for the determination quarter multiplied by the 7    hospital's total number of inpatient admissions for 8    category of service 22 for the determination quarter.9        (10) For high Medicaid hospitals an amount equal to 10    $400 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 24 11    case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied by 12    the hospital's total number of category of service 24 paid 13    EAPG outpatient claims for the determination quarter.14        (11) For high Medicaid hospitals an amount equal to 15    $240 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 27 16    and 28 case mix index for the determination quarter 17    multiplied by the hospital's total number of category of 18    service 27 and 28 paid EAPGs for the determination 19    quarter.20        (12) For high Medicaid hospitals an amount equal to 21    $290 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 29 22    case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied by 23    the hospital's total number of category of service 29 paid 24    EAPGs for the determination quarter.25        (13) For long term acute care hospitals the amount of 26    $495 multiplied by the hospital's total number of   SB1653- 23 -LRB104 09504 KTG 19567 b1    inpatient days for the determination quarter.2        (14) For psychiatric hospitals the amount of $210 3    multiplied by the hospital's total number of inpatient 4    days for category of service 21 for the determination 5    quarter.6        (15) For psychiatric hospitals the amount of $250 7    multiplied by the hospital's total number of outpatient 8    claims for category of service 27 and 28 for the 9    determination quarter.10        (16) For rehabilitation hospitals the amount of $410 11    multiplied by the hospital's total number of inpatient 12    days for category of service 22 for the determination 13    quarter.14        (17) For rehabilitation hospitals the amount of $100 15    multiplied by the hospital's total number of outpatient 16    claims for category of service 29 for the determination 17    quarter.18        (18) Effective for the Payout Quarter beginning 19    January 1, 2023, for the directed payments to hospitals 20    required under this subsection, the Department shall 21    establish the amounts that shall be used to calculate such 22    directed payments using the methodologies specified in 23    this paragraph. The Department shall use a single, uniform 24    rate, adjusted for acuity as specified in paragraphs (1) 25    through (12), for all categories of inpatient services 26    provided by each class of hospitals and a single uniform   SB1653- 24 -LRB104 09504 KTG 19567 b1    rate, adjusted for acuity as specified in paragraphs (1) 2    through (12), for all categories of outpatient services 3    provided by each class of hospitals. The Department shall 4    establish such amounts so that the total amount of 5    payments to each hospital under this Section in calendar 6    year 2023 is projected to be substantially similar to the 7    total amount of such payments received by the hospital 8    under this Section in calendar year 2021, adjusted for 9    increased funding provided for fixed pool directed 10    payments under subsection (g) in calendar year 2022, 11    assuming that the volume and acuity of claims are held 12    constant. The Department shall publish the directed 13    payment amounts to be established under this subsection on 14    its website by November 15, 2022. 15        (19) Each hospital shall be paid 1/3 of their 16    quarterly inpatient and outpatient directed payment in 17    each of the 3 months of the Payout Quarter, in accordance 18    with directions provided to each MCO by the Department.19        (20) Each MCO shall pay each hospital the Monthly 20    Directed Payment amount as identified by the Department on 21    its quarterly determination report.22    Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, if 23the Department determines that the actual total hospital 24utilization data that is used to calculate the fixed rate 25directed payments is substantially different than anticipated 26when the rates in this subsection were initially determined   SB1653- 25 -LRB104 09504 KTG 19567 b1for unforeseeable circumstances (such as the COVID-19 pandemic 2or some other public health emergency), the Department may 3adjust the rates specified in this subsection so that the 4total directed payments approximate the total spending amount 5anticipated when the rates were initially established. 6    Definitions. As used in this subsection:7            (A) "Payout Quarter" means each calendar quarter, 8        beginning July 1, 2020.9            (B) "Determination Quarter" means each calendar 10        quarter which ends 3 months prior to the first day of 11        each Payout Quarter.12            (C) "Case mix index" means a hospital specific 13        calculation. For inpatient claims the case mix index 14        is calculated each quarter by summing the relative 15        weight of all inpatient Diagnosis-Related Group (DRG) 16        claims for a category of service in the applicable 17        Determination Quarter and dividing the sum by the 18        number of sum total of all inpatient DRG admissions 19        for the category of service for the associated claims. 20        The case mix index for outpatient claims is calculated 21        each quarter by summing the relative weight of all 22        paid EAPGs in the applicable Determination Quarter and 23        dividing the sum by the sum total of paid EAPGs for the 24        associated claims.25    (i) Beginning January 1, 2021, the rates for directed 26payments shall be recalculated in order to spend the   SB1653- 26 -LRB104 09504 KTG 19567 b1additional funds for directed payments that result from 2reduction in the amount of pass-through payments allowed under 3federal regulations. The additional funds for directed 4payments shall be allocated proportionally to each class of 5hospitals based on that class' proportion of services.6        (1) Beginning January 1, 2024, the fixed pool directed 7    payment amounts and the associated annual initial rates 8    referenced in paragraph (6) of subsection (f) for each 9    hospital class shall be uniformly increased by a ratio of 10    not less than, the ratio of the total pass-through 11    reduction amount pursuant to paragraph (4) of subsection 12    (j), for the hospitals comprising the hospital fixed pool 13    directed payment class for the next calendar year, to the 14    total inpatient and outpatient directed payments for the 15    hospitals comprising the hospital fixed pool directed 16    payment class paid during the preceding calendar year. 17        (2) Beginning January 1, 2024, the fixed rates for the 18    directed payments referenced in paragraph (18) of 19    subsection (h) for each hospital class shall be uniformly 20    increased by a ratio of not less than, the ratio of the 21    total pass-through reduction amount pursuant to paragraph 22    (4) of subsection (j), for the hospitals comprising the 23    hospital directed payment class for the next calendar 24    year, to the total inpatient and outpatient directed 25    payments for the hospitals comprising the hospital fixed 26    rate directed payment class paid during the preceding   SB1653- 27 -LRB104 09504 KTG 19567 b1    calendar year. 2    (j) Pass-through payments.3        (1) For the period July 1, 2020 through December 31, 4    2020, the Department shall assign quarterly pass-through 5    payments to each class of hospitals equal to one-fourth of 6    the following annual allocations:7            (A) $390,487,095 to safety-net hospitals.8            (B) $62,553,886 to critical access hospitals.9            (C) $345,021,438 to high Medicaid hospitals.10            (D) $551,429,071 to general acute care hospitals.11            (E) $27,283,870 to long term acute care hospitals.12            (F) $40,825,444 to freestanding psychiatric 13        hospitals.14            (G) $9,652,108 to freestanding rehabilitation 15        hospitals.16        (2) For the period of July 1, 2020 through December 17    31, 2020, the pass-through payments shall at a minimum 18    ensure hospitals receive a total amount of monthly 19    payments under this Section as received in calendar year 20    2019 in accordance with this Article and paragraph (1) of 21    subsection (d-5) of Section 14-12, exclusive of amounts 22    received through payments referenced in subsection (b).23        (3) For the calendar year beginning January 1, 2023, 24    the Department shall establish the annual pass-through 25    allocation to each class of hospitals and the pass-through 26    payments to each hospital so that the total amount of   SB1653- 28 -LRB104 09504 KTG 19567 b1    payments to each hospital under this Section in calendar 2    year 2023 is projected to be substantially similar to the 3    total amount of such payments received by the hospital 4    under this Section in calendar year 2021, adjusted for 5    increased funding provided for fixed pool directed 6    payments under subsection (g) in calendar year 2022, 7    assuming that the volume and acuity of claims are held 8    constant. The Department shall publish the pass-through 9    allocation to each class and the pass-through payments to 10    each hospital to be established under this subsection on 11    its website by November 15, 2022. 12        (4) For the calendar years beginning January 1, 2021 13    and January 1, 2022, each hospital's pass-through payment 14    amount shall be reduced proportionally to the reduction of 15    all pass-through payments required by federal regulations. 16    Beginning January 1, 2024, the Department shall reduce 17    total pass-through payments by the minimum amount 18    necessary to comply with federal regulations. Pass-through 19    payments to safety-net hospitals, as defined in Section 20    5-5e.1 of this Code, shall not be reduced until all 21    pass-through payments to other hospitals have been 22    eliminated. All other hospitals shall have their 23    pass-through payments reduced proportionally. 24    (k) At least 30 days prior to each calendar year, the 25Department shall notify each hospital of changes to the 26payment methodologies in this Section, including, but not   SB1653- 29 -LRB104 09504 KTG 19567 b1limited to, changes in the fixed rate directed payment rates, 2the aggregate pass-through payment amount for all hospitals, 3and the hospital's pass-through payment amount for the 4upcoming calendar year.5    (l) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Section, 6the Department may adopt rules to change the methodology for 7directed and pass-through payments as set forth in this 8Section, but only to the extent necessary to obtain federal 9approval of a necessary State Plan amendment or Directed 10Payment Preprint or to otherwise conform to federal law or 11federal regulation.12    (m) As used in this subsection, "managed care 13organization" or "MCO" means an entity which contracts with 14the Department to provide services where payment for medical 15services is made on a capitated basis, excluding contracted 16entities for dual eligible or Department of Children and 17Family Services youth populations.18    (n) In order to address the escalating infant mortality 19rates among minority communities in Illinois, the State shall, 20subject to appropriation, create a pool of funding of at least 21$50,000,000 annually to be disbursed among safety-net 22hospitals that maintain perinatal designation from the 23Department of Public Health. No safety-net hospital eligible 24for funds under this subsection shall receive less than 25$5,000,000 annually. The funding shall be used to preserve or 26enhance OB/GYN services or other specialty services at the   SB1653- 30 -LRB104 09504 KTG 19567 b1receiving hospital, with the distribution of funding to be 2established by rule and with consideration to perinatal 3hospitals with safe birthing levels and quality metrics for 4healthy mothers and babies.5    (o) In order to address the growing challenges of 6providing stable access to healthcare in rural Illinois, 7including perinatal services, behavioral healthcare including 8substance use disorder services (SUDs) and other specialty 9services, and to expand access to telehealth services among 10rural communities in Illinois, the Department of Healthcare 11and Family Services shall administer a program to provide at 12least $10,000,000 in financial support annually to critical 13access hospitals for delivery of perinatal and OB/GYN 14services, behavioral healthcare including SUDS, other 15specialty services and telehealth services. The funding shall 16be used to preserve or enhance perinatal and OB/GYN services, 17behavioral healthcare including SUDS, other specialty 18services, as well as the explanation of telehealth services by 19the receiving hospital, with the distribution of funding to be 20established by rule. 21    (p) For calendar year 2023, the final amounts, rates, and 22payments under subsections (c), (d-2), (g), (h), and (j) shall 23be established by the Department, so that the sum of the total 24estimated annual payments under subsections (c), (d-2), (g), 25(h), and (j) for each hospital class for calendar year 2023, is 26no less than:   SB1653- 31 -LRB104 09504 KTG 19567 b1        (1) $858,260,000 to safety-net hospitals.2        (2) $86,200,000 to critical access hospitals.3        (3) $1,765,000,000 to high Medicaid hospitals.4        (4) $673,860,000 to general acute care hospitals.5        (5) $48,330,000 to long term acute care hospitals.6        (6) $89,110,000 to freestanding psychiatric hospitals.7        (7) $24,300,000 to freestanding rehabilitation 8    hospitals.9        (8) $32,570,000 to public hospitals.10    (q) Hospital Pandemic Recovery Stabilization Payments. The 11Department shall disburse a pool of $460,000,000 in stability 12payments to hospitals prior to April 1, 2023. The allocation 13of the pool shall be based on the hospital directed payment 14classes and directed payments issued, during Calendar Year 152022 with added consideration to safety net hospitals, as 16defined in subdivision (f)(1)(B) of this Section, and critical 17access hospitals. 18(Source: P.A. 102-4, eff. 4-27-21; 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 19102-886, eff. 5-17-22; 102-1115, eff. 1-9-23; 103-102, eff. 206-16-23; 103-593, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)